src/noun-sme-morph.txt
LEXICON IHTAMAT   !!= * __@CODE@__ Actio plurals
 +N+Sem/Act+SgCmp:%> R ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-Spell:»#viđá K ;
! +N+Sem/Act+Der/viđi+Adv:»#viđi K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+SgNomCmp+Err/Sub:# VEARA ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Ess:%>in K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Ess+Use/NG:%>en K ;   !Dialects
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Nom:%>at K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Gen:%>ijd K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+PlGenCmp:%>ijd R ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Acc:%>ijd K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Ill:%>ijdda K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Loc:%>ijn K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Loc+Err/Sub:%>ijnna K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Loc+South+Err/Sub:%>ijs K ; ! !SOUTH
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Com:%>ijgujn K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Com/Sh:%>ij%- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
! +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Nom:%>ijddá%> Px1V ;
! +Pl+Nom:%>ijddi%> PxV ; !^P^
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Gen:%>ijddi%> PxV ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Acc:%>ijddi%> PxV ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Ill:%>ijddás%> PxC ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Loc:%>ijnni%> PxV ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Com:%>ijddi%> PxPlComV1 ;


LEXICON IHTALUDDAMAT   !!= * __@CODE@__  No compound-forms, plural only, cmp-forms reintroduced
 +N+Sem/Act+Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-Spell:»#viđá K ;
! +N+Sem/Act+Der/viđi+Adv:»#viđi K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+SgNomCmp+Err/Sub:# VEARA ;
 +N+Sem/Act+SgCmp:%> R ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Ess:%>in K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Ess+Err/Sub:%>en K ;   !SDialects
! +N+Sem/Act+Ess:%>e K ; !not for nouns
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Nom:%>at K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Gen:%>ijd K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+PlGenCmp:%>ijd R ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Acc:%>ijd K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Ill:%>ijdda K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Loc:%>ijn K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Loc+Err/Sub:%>ijnna K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Loc+South+Err/Sub:%>ijs K ; ! !SOUTH
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Com:%>ijgujn K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Com/Sh:%>ij%- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
! +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Nom:%>ijddá%> Px1V ;
! +Pl+Nom:%>ijddi%> PxV ; !^P^
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Gen:%>ijddi%> PxV ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Acc:%>ijddi%> PxV ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Ill:%>ijddás%> PxC ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Loc:%>ijnni%> PxV ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Com:%>ijddi%> PxPlComV1 ;




LEXICON FALLA- !!= * __@CODE@__
 BOHCCO ;
 BOHCCU ;

LEXICON BOAZU-NE !!= * __@CODE@__
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +SgNomCmp@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@:X7@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@ R ;
 +SgNomCmp@U.NeedsVowRed.OFF@:@U.NeedsVowRed.OFF@ R ;
 +Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-Spell:»X7viđá K ;
! +Der/viđi+Adv:»X7viđi K ;
 +Ess:n K ;
 +Ess:n%> PxC ;


LEXICON BOHCCO !!= * __@CODE@__
 +Sg+Nom: PxV2 ;
 +Sg+Gen: K ;
 +Sg+Gen: PxV2 ;
 +SgGenCmp: R ; 		! Already in LEXICON BOAZU
 +Sg+Acc: K ;
 +Sg+Acc: PxV2 ;
 +Sg+Ill:s%> PxC ;
 +Sg+Loc:s K ;
 +Sg+Loc+South+Err/Sub:n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Loc:st%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Nom:t K ;
 +Pl+Nom+Err/Sub:k K ; ! !Skániid dialect

LEXICON BOHCCU !!= * __@CODE@__
 +Sg+Ill:j K ;
 +Sg+Com:jn K ;
 +Sg+Com:jn%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Gen:jd K ;
 +PlGenCmp:jd R ;
! +Pl+Nom:jd%> Px1C ;
 +Pl+Gen:jd%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Acc:jd K ;
 +Pl+Acc:jd%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Ill:jde K ;
 +Pl+Ill:jdasa%> PxV ;
 +Pl+Loc:jn K ;
 +Pl+Loc+South+Err/Sub:js K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Pl+Loc:jn%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Com:jgujn K ;
 +Pl+Com/Sh:j%- ENDLEX ;  !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +Pl+Com:jd%> PxPlComC ;
 +Pl+Com+Err/Sub:jn%> PxPlComC ;
